testing/sje-tests.yaml
  Noun - viellja: # Even syll
    viellja+N+Sg+Gen: vielja

  Noun - vierro: # Even syll
    vierro+N+Sg+Gen: viero

  Noun - vierrodimájjge: # Even syll
    vierrodimájjge+N+Sg+Gen: vierrodimájge

  Noun - vippsja: # Even syll
    vippsja+N+Sg+Gen: vippsja

  Noun - vuakksa: # Even syll
    vuakksa+N+Sg+Gen: vuaksa

  Noun - vuassa: # Even syll
    vuassa+N+Sg+Gen: vuasa

  Noun - vuobme: # Even syll
    vuobme+N+Sg+Gen: vuome

  Noun - vuobmelådde: # Even syll
    vuobmelådde+N+Sg+Gen: vuobmelådde

  Noun - vuolle: # Even syll
    vuolle+N+Sg+Gen: vuole

  Noun - vuorrpe: # Even syll
    vuorrpe+N+Sg+Gen: vuorpe

  Noun - vuäbbne: # Even syll
    vuäbbne+N+Sg+Gen: vuäbne

  Noun - vuävvda: # Even syll
    vuävvda+N+Sg+Gen: vuävda

  Noun - vágge: # Even syll
    vágge+N+Sg+Gen: vágge

  Noun - vájbmo: # Even syll
    vájbmo+N+Sg+Gen: vájmo

  Noun - vájmmo: # Even syll
    vájmmo+N+Sg+Gen: vájmmo

  Noun - várre: # Even syll
    várre+N+Sg+Gen: váre

  Noun - vähkke: # Even syll
    vähkke+N+Sg+Gen: vähkke

  Noun - vällja: # Even syll
    vällja+N+Sg+Gen: välja

  Noun - Árjapluovve: # Even syll
    Árjapluovve+N+Sg+Gen: Árjapluove

  Noun - áddjá: # Even syll
    áddjá+N+Sg+Gen: áddjáXXXXXXXX

  Noun - áhkká: # Even syll
    áhkká+N+Sg+Gen: áhkká

  Noun - áhpe: # Even syll
    áhpe+N+Sg+Gen: ábe

  Noun - áhttje: # Even syll
    áhttje+N+Sg+Gen: áhtje

  Noun - ájjge: # Even syll
    ájjge+N+Sg+Gen: ájge

  Noun - ájjro: # Even syll
    ájjro+N+Sg+Gen: ájro

  Noun - ájjá: # Even syll
    ájjá+N+Sg+Gen: ájá

  Noun - ákksjo: # Even syll
    ákksjo+N+Sg+Gen: ákksjo

  Noun - áksjo: # Even syll
    áksjo+N+Sg+Gen: áksjo

  Noun - álldo: # Even syll
    álldo+N+Sg+Gen: áldo

  Noun - árrbe: # Even syll
    árrbe+N+Sg+Gen: árbe

  Noun - árrpo: # Even syll
    árrpo+N+Sg+Gen: árpo

  Noun - átjárájjde: # Even syll
    átjárájjde+N+Sg+Gen: átjárájde

  Noun - ávvke: # Even syll
    ávvke+N+Sg+Gen: ávvke

  Noun - ávvo: # Even syll
    ávvo+N+Sg+Gen: ávo

  Noun - äddne: # Even syll
    äddne+N+Sg+Gen: ädne

  Noun - åbba: # Even syll
    åbba+N+Sg+Gen: åbba

  Noun - åbbá: # Even syll
    åbbá+N+Sg+Gen: åbbá

  Noun - åjvevuolle: # Even syll
    åjvevuolle+N+Sg+Gen: åjvevuole

  Noun - åkkse: # Even syll
    åkkse+N+Sg+Gen: åkse

  Noun - ålmáj: # Even syll
    ålmáj+N+Sg+Gen: ålbmá

  Noun - årddårádde: # Even syll
    årddårádde+N+Sg+Gen: årddårádde

  Noun - åsse: # Even syll
    åsse+N+Sg+Gen: åse
